Maryland, session 2025, HB0214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 420 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Human Services
7–114.
(b) The Department shall oversee and administer the following programs and
units:
(1) constituent services and ombudsmen programs;
(2) the Assistive Technology Guaranteed Loan Program under Subtitle 6
of this title;
(3) the Office of Personal Assistance Services, including the Attendant
Care Program under Subtitle 4 of this title;
(4) Telecommunications Access of Maryland under Subtitle 8 of this title;
[and]
(5) Telecommunications Devices and Distribution of Accessible
Information for Disabled Individuals under Subtitle 9 of this title; AND
(6) THE MARYLAND ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM UNDER
SUBTITLE 12 OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 12. MARYLAND ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEVICE” MEANS ANY ITEM, PIECE OF
EQUIPMENT, OR PRODUCT SYSTEM, WHETHER ACQUIRED COMMERCIALLY,
MODIFIED, OR CUSTOMIZED, THAT IS USED TO INCREASE, MAINTAIN, OR IMPROVE
FUNCTIONAL CAPABILITIES OF INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(C) “ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY SERVICE” MEANS ANY SERVICE THAT ASSISTS
AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY IN THE SELECTION, ACQUISITION, OR USE OF AN
ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEVICE.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FUND.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 420
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY
PROGRAM.
7–1202.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) INCREASE ACCESS TO ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEVICES AND
ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
(2) SUPPORT THE STATE’S EFFORTS TO IMPROVE THE PROVISION OF
ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY TO INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES OF ALL AGES,
INCLUDING UNDERREPRESENTED POPULATIONS, THROUGH COMPREHENSIVE
STATEWIDE PROGRAMS OF TECHNOLOGY–RELATED ASSISTANCE;
(3) ENSURE STATEWIDE ACCESS TO ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY
LENDING LIBRARIES THAT ALLOW INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES AND THOSE
SUPPORTING INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES TO LEARN ABOUT, TRY, AND BORROW
ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEVICES THROUGH SHORT–TERM LOANS; AND
(4) IMPLEMENT ACTIVITIES REQUIRED BY FEDERAL GRANTS,
INCLUDING FUNDING AUTHORIZED UNDER THE FEDERAL 21ST CENTURY ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY ACT.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE ACCESS TO OR CONDUCT ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY SERVICES THAT INCLUDE ANY ACTIVITY DESCRIBED IN THE FEDERAL
21ST CENTURY ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY ACT.
7–1203.
(A) THERE IS AN ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FUND IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO RECEIVE REVENUE FROM ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENTS;
(2) ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY TRAINING;
– 3 –

Ch. 420 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) DIGITAL ACCESSIBILITY TRAINING;
(4) DIGITAL ACCESSIBILITY WEBSITE EVALUATIONS; AND
(5) DIGITAL ACCESSIBILITY REMEDIATION SERVICES.
(C) THE SECRETARY, THROUGH THE PROGRAM, SHALL ADMINISTER THE
FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE OPERATIONS OF THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE OF ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEVICES.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE PROGRAM IS
SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT
OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 420
7–1204.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ESTABLISH AN ENTITLEMENT
PROGRAM.
7–1205.
THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –